Wisconsin, session 2025, SB297.
do enact as follows:SB297,11Section 1. 20.370 (1) (fs) of the statutes is amended to read:SB297,2,14220.370 (1) (fs) Endangered resources — voluntary payments; sales, leases, and 3fees. As a continuing appropriation, from moneys received as amounts designated 4under ss. 71.10 (5) (b) and 71.30 (10) (b), the net amounts certified under ss. 71.10 5(5) (h) 4. and 71.30 (10) (h) 3., all moneys received from the sale or lease of resources 6derived from the land in the state natural areas system, and all moneys received 7from fees collected under ss. 29.319 (2), 29.563 (10) (a), and 341.14 (6r) (b) 5. and, 812., and 23., for the purposes of the endangered resources program, as defined 9under ss. 71.10 (5) (a) 2. and 71.30 (10) (a) 2. Three percent of the moneys certified 10under ss. 71.10 (5) (h) 4. and 71.30 (10) (h) 3. in each fiscal year and 3 percent of the 11fees received under s. 341.14 (6r) (b) 5. and, 12., and 23. in each fiscal year shall be 12allocated for wildlife damage control and payment of claims for damage associated 13with endangered or threatened species, except that this combined allocation may 14not exceed $100,000 per fiscal year.SB297,215Section 2. 20.395 (5) (cj) of the statutes is amended to read:SB297,3,21620.395 (5) (cj) Vehicle registration, special group plates, state funds. From the 17general fund, all moneys received under s. 341.14 (6r) (b) 3. and (fm) 2. and all 18moneys transferred under 2025 Wisconsin Act .... (this act), section 10 (1), for the 1purpose of producing and issuing special group plates under s. 341.14 (6r) (f) and 2(fm) and returning payments under s. 341.14 (6r) (fm) 2. a.SB297,33Section 3. 25.29 (1) (f) of the statutes is amended to read:SB297,3,4425.29 (1) (f) Moneys received under s. 341.14 (6r) (b) 5., 7., and 12., and 23.SB297,45Section 4. 25.40 (1) (a) 38. of the statutes is created to read:SB297,3,8625.40 (1) (a) 38. Moneys received under s. 341.14 (6r) (b) 23. that are deposited 7into the conservation fund and credited to the appropriation account under s. 820.370 (1) (fs).SB297,59Section 5. 341.14 (6r) (b) 23. of the statutes is created to read:SB297,4,210341.14 (6r) (b) 23. In addition to the fee under subd. 2., a voluntary payment 11of $25 shall be collected in connection with the issuance or renewal of a plate issued 12on an annual basis for the special group specified under par. (f) 70. In addition to 13the fee under subd. 2., a voluntary payment of $50 shall be collected in connection 14with the issuance or renewal of a plate issued on a biennial basis for the special 15group specified under par. (f) 70. if the plate is issued or renewed during the first 16year of the biennial registration period or $25 for the issuance or renewal if the 17plate is issued or renewed during the 2nd year of the biennial registration period. 18No plate may be issued for the special group specified under par. (f) 70. unless the 19voluntary payment under this subdivision is collected. All moneys received under 20this subdivision, in excess of $23,700 or the actual initial costs of production for the 21special group plates under par. (f) 70., whichever is less, shall be deposited in the 22conservation fund and credited to the appropriation account under s. 20.370 (1) (fs). 1To the extent permitted under ch. 71, the voluntary payment under this subdivision 2is deductible as a charitable contribution for purposes of the taxes under ch. 71.SB297,63Section 6. 341.14 (6r) (c) of the statutes is amended to read:SB297,6,114341.14 (6r) (c) Special group plates shall display the word “Wisconsin”, the 5name of the applicable authorized special group, a symbol representing the special 6group, not exceeding one position, and identifying letters or numbers or both, not 7exceeding 7 positions and not less than one position. Except as provided in this 8paragraph, the department shall specify the design for special group plates, but the 9department shall consult the president of the University of Wisconsin System 10before specifying the word or symbol used to identify the special groups under par. 11(f) 35. to 47., the secretary of natural resources before specifying the word or symbol 12used to identify the special groups under par. (f) 50. and, 59., and 70., the chief 13executive officer of the professional football team and an authorized representative 14of the league of professional football teams described in s. 229.823 to which that 15team belongs before specifying the design for the applicable special group plate 16under par. (f) 55., the chief trademark officer of Harley-Davidson Michigan, LLC 17before specifying the design for the applicable special group plate under par. (f) 61r., 18the department of veterans affairs before specifying the design for the special group 19plates under par. (f) 49d., 49h., and 49s., the department of tourism and chief 20executive officer of the organization specified in par. (f) 55m. before specifying the 21design and word or symbol used to identify the special group name for special group 22plates under par. (f) 55m., and the Three Harbors Council, Boy Scouts of America 23NESA License Committee before specifying the designs for the initial special group 1plate under par. (f) 66. Special group plates under par. (f) 50. shall be as similar as 2possible to regular registration plates in color and design. Special group plates 3issued under par. (f) 62. shall display the words “In God We Trust”. The 4department shall make available 2 designs for the special group plates under par. 5(f) 60. The department may not specify any design for the special group plates 6under par. (f) 60. unless the design is approved by the executive vice president of the 7Milwaukee Brewers Baseball Club LP. The department may not specify any design 8for the special group plates under par. (f) 65. unless the design is approved by the 9president of the Milwaukee Bucks. The word or symbol used to identify the special 10group under par. (f) 59. shall be different from the word or symbol used to identify 11the special group under par. (f) 50., and the design shall cover the entire plate. 12Special group plates issued under par. (f) 70. shall display the words “Protect 13Pollinators,” and the design shall cover the entire plate. Special group plates under 14par. (f) 61m. shall display a logo or image of the lion associated with the Lions Clubs 15International. Special group plates under par. (f) 61r. shall display a bar and shield 16logo associated with Harley-Davidson, Inc., on the left portion of the plates and the 17words “share the road” on the bottom portion of the plates. Special group plates 18under par. (f) 63. shall display the words “Trout Unlimited.” Special group plates 19under par. (f) 65m. shall display the words “Help Cure Childhood Cancer” in purple 20lettering and a symbol comprised of a purple handprint superimposed upon a red 21heart superimposed upon a gold ribbon. Special group plates under par. (f) 66. shall 22display the words “Scouting Alumni” and, at the option of the vehicle owner, either 23a logo or symbol associated with the Boy Scouts of America or a logo or symbol 1associated with the Eagle Scouts. Special group plates under par. (f) 67. shall 2display a logo or symbol associated with Whitetails Unlimited. Special group plates 3under par. (f) 68. shall display a logo or symbol associated with the Wisconsin Rocky 4Mountain Elk Foundation. Special group plates under par. (f) 69. shall display the 5words “Nurses Change Lives” and an image of a heart partially encircled by a 6stethoscope. Notwithstanding par. (e), special group plates under par. (f) 33m. and 748m. shall be the same color and design that was specified by the department for 8special group plates under par. (f) 33. and 48., respectively, immediately prior to 9January 1, 2007. The design for special group plates under par. (f) 33. and 48. shall 10be different from the design of special group plates under par. (f) 33m. and 48m., 11respectively.SB297,712Section 7. 341.14 (6r) (e) of the statutes is amended to read:SB297,7,613341.14 (6r) (e) The department shall specify one combination of colors for 14special group plates for groups or organizations which are not military in nature 15and not special group plates under par. (f) 35. to 47., 50., and, 59., and 70., for each 16professional football team under par. (f) 55., for each professional baseball team 17under par. (f) 60., and for each professional basketball team under par. (f) 65. The 18department shall specify one combination of colors for special group plates under 19par. (f) 35. to 47. Subject to par. (c), the department shall specify the word or words 20comprising the special group name and the symbol to be displayed upon special 21group plates for a group or organization which is not military in nature after 22consultation with the chief executive officer in this state of the group or 23organization. The department shall require that the word or words and symbol for 1a university specified under par. (f) 35. to 47. be a registration decal or tag and 2affixed to the special group plate and be of the colors for a university specified 3under par. (f) 35. to 47. that the president of the University of Wisconsin System 4specifies. The department shall consult the chief trademark officer of Harley-5Davidson Michigan, LLC before specifying the colors for the special group plate 6under par. (f) 61r.SB297,87Section 8. 341.14 (6r) (f) 70. of the statutes is created to read:SB297,7,98341.14 (6r) (f) 70. Persons interested in supporting the protection of 9pollinators.SB297,910Section 9. 341.14 (6r) (fm) 7. of the statutes is amended to read:SB297,7,1711341.14 (6r) (fm) 7. After October 1, 1998, additional authorized special groups 12may only be special groups designated by the department under this paragraph. 13The authorized special groups enumerated in par. (f) shall be limited solely to those 14special groups specified under par. (f) on October 1, 1998. This subdivision does not 15apply to the special groups specified under par. (f) 3m., 6m., 9g., 9m., 12g., 12m., 1615m., 15n., 15o., 15p., 15q., 19m., 33m., 48m., 49d., 49h., 49s., 54., 55., 55m., 56., 1757., 58., 59., 60., 61., 61m., 61r., 62., 63., 64., 65., 65m., 66., 67., 68., and 69., and 70.SB297,1018Section 10. Fiscal changes.SB297,7,2219(1) There is transferred from the general fund to the appropriation account 20under s. 20.395 (5) (cj) $23,700 in the fiscal year in which this subsection takes 21effect. Moneys transferred under this subsection shall be used to cover the initial 22costs of production of the special group plates under s. 341.14 (6r) (f) 70.SB297,1123Section 11. Effective date.SB297,8,31(1) This act takes effect on the first day of the 10th month beginning after 2publication, or on the 2nd day after publication of the 2025 biennial budget act, 3whichever is later.SB297,8,44